Maine, session 132, LD1999.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §4401, sub-§4, ¶K is enacted to read:
K. "Subdivision" does not include the lease of a tract or parcel of land or a portion of
a tract or parcel of land that is used primarily for farming or ranching as defined in
Title 7, section 251, subsection 4 and that does not convey fee simple ownership or
allow for the construction of permanent residential dwellings.
Page 1 - 132LR2693(03)